California statutes. California Constitution
(c) In a case where a person is disqualified from holding office or is required to forfeit an office under subdivisions (a) and (b), that disqualification or forfeiture shall create a vacancy in office, which vacancy shall be filled in the manner provided by law for the filling of a vacancy in that particular office. 

(d) Once the judgment of liability is entered by the trial court and the time for filing a notice of appeal has expired, or all possibility of direct attack in the courts of this State has
been finally exhausted, the person shall be disqualified from or shall forfeit the office involved in that election and shall have no authority to exercise the powers or perform the duties of the office.

(e) This section shall apply to libelous or slanderous statements made on or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Sec. 10 added June 5, 1984, by Prop. 20. Res.Ch. 181, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 11.

(a) The Legislators’ Retirement System shall not pay any unmodified retirement allowance or its actuarial equivalent to any person who on or after January 1, 1987, entered for the first time any state office for which membership in the
Legislators’ Retirement System was elective or to any beneficiary or survivor of such a person, which exceeds the higher of (1) the salary receivable by the person currently serving in the office in which the retired person served or (2) the highest salary that was received by the retired person while serving in that office.

(b) The Judges’ Retirement System shall not pay any unmodified retirement allowance or its actuarial equivalent to any person who on or after January 1, 1987, entered for the first time any judicial office subject to the Judges’ Retirement System or to any beneficiary or survivor of such a person, which exceeds the higher of (1) the salary receivable by the person currently serving in the judicial office in which the retired person served or (2) the highest salary that was received by the retired person while serving in that judicial office.

(c) The
Legislature may define the terms used in this section.

(d) If any part of this measure or the application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications which reasonably can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Sec. 11 amended (by adding subd. (d)) Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 140. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

ARTICLE IX EDUCATION [SECTION 1. - SEC. 16.]

SECTION 1.

A general diffusion of knowledge and intelligence being essential to the preservation of the rights and liberties of the people, the Legislature shall encourage by all suitable means the promotion of intellectual, scientific, moral, and agricultural improvement.

(History: Sec. 1 adopted 1879.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 2.

A Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be elected by the qualified electors of the State at each gubernatorial election. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall enter upon the duties of the office on the first Monday after the first day of January next succeeding each gubernatorial election. No Superintendent of Public Instruction may serve more than 2 terms.

(History: Sec. 2 amended Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 140. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 2.1.

The State Board of Education, on nomination of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, shall appoint one Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction and three Associate Superintendents of Public Instruction who shall be exempt from state civil service and whose terms of office shall be four years.

This section shall not be construed as prohibiting the appointment, in accordance with law, of additional Associate Superintendents of Public Instruction subject to state civil service.

(History: Sec. 2.1 added Nov. 5, 1946, by Prop. 9. Res.Ch. 161, 1945.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 3.

A Superintendent of Schools for each county may be elected by the qualified electors thereof at each gubernatorial election or may be appointed by the county board of education, and the manner of the selection shall be determined by a majority vote of the electors of the county voting on the question; provided, that two or more counties may, by an election conducted pursuant to Section 3.2 of this article, unite for the purpose of electing or appointing one joint superintendent for the counties so uniting.

(History: Sec. 3 amended Nov. 2, 1976, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 57, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 3.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this Constitution to the contrary, the Legislature shall prescribe the qualifications required of county superintendents of schools, and for these purposes shall classify the several counties in the State.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this Constitution to the contrary, the county board of education or joint county board of education, as the case may be, shall fix the salary of the county superintendent of schools or the joint county superintendent of schools,
respectively.

(History: Sec. 3.1 amended Nov. 2, 1976, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 57, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 3.2.

Notwithstanding any provision of this Constitution to the contrary, any two or more chartered counties, or nonchartered counties, or any combination thereof, may, by a majority vote of the electors of each such county voting on the proposition at an election called for that purpose in each such county, establish one joint board of education and one joint county superintendent of schools for the counties so uniting. A joint county board of education and a joint county superintendent of schools shall be governed by the general statutes and shall not be governed by the provisions of any county
charter.

(History: Sec. 3.2 added Nov. 2, 1976, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 57, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 3.3.

Except as provided in Section 3.2 of this article, it shall be competent to provide in any charter framed for a county under any provision of this Constitution, or by the amendment of any such charter, for the election of the members of the county board of education of such county and for their qualifications and terms of office.

(History: Sec. 3.3 amended Nov. 2, 1976, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 57, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 5.

The Legislature shall provide for a system of common schools by which a free school shall be kept up and supported in each district at least six months in every year, after the first year in which a school has been established.

(History: Sec. 5 adopted 1879.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 6.

Each person, other than a substitute employee, employed by a school district as a teacher or in any other position requiring certification qualifications shall be paid a salary which shall be at the rate of an annual salary of not less than twenty-four hundred dollars ($2,400) for a person serving full time, as defined by law.

The Public School System shall include all kindergarten schools, elementary schools, secondary schools, technical schools, and state colleges, established in accordance with law and, in addition, the school districts and the other
agencies authorized to maintain them. No school or college or any other part of the Public School System shall be, directly or indirectly, transferred from the Public School System or placed under the jurisdiction of any authority other than one included within the Public School System.

The Legislature shall add to the State School Fund such other means from the revenues of the State as shall provide in said fund for apportionment in each fiscal year, an amount not less than one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per pupil in average daily attendance in the kindergarten schools, elementary schools, secondary schools, and technical schools in the Public School System during the next preceding fiscal year.

The entire State School Fund shall be apportioned in each fiscal year in such manner as the Legislature may provide, through the school districts and other agencies maintaining such schools, for the support of, and aid to,
kindergarten schools, elementary schools, secondary schools, and technical schools except that there shall be apportioned to each school district in each fiscal year not less than one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per pupil in average daily attendance in the district during the next preceding fiscal year and except that the amount apportioned to each school district in each fiscal year shall be not less than twenty-four hundred dollars ($2,400).

Solely with respect to any retirement system provided for in the charter of any county or city and county pursuant to the provisions of which the contributions of, and benefits to, certificated employees of a school district who are members of such system are based upon the proportion of the salaries of such certificated employees contributed by said county or city and county, all amounts apportioned to said county or city and county, or to school districts therein, pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be
considered as though derived from county or city and county school taxes for the support of county and city and county government and not money provided by the State within the meaning of this section.

(History: Sec. 6 amended Nov. 5, 1974, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 70, 1974.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 6½.

Nothing in this constitution contained shall forbid the formation of districts for school purposes situate in more than one county or the issuance of bonds by such districts under such general laws as have been or may hereafter be prescribed by the legislature; and the officers mentioned in such laws shall be authorized to levy and assess such taxes and perform all such other acts as may be prescribed therein for the purpose of paying such bonds and carrying out the other powers conferred upon such districts; provided, that all such bonds shall be issued subject to the limitations
prescribed in section eighteen of article eleven hereof.

(History: Sec. 6½ added Nov. 7, 1922, by Prop. 26. Res.Ch. 46, 1921.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 7.

The Legislature shall provide for the appointment or election of the State Board of Education and a board of education in each county or for the election of a joint county board of education for two or more counties.

(History: Sec. 7 amended Nov. 2, 1976, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 57, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 7.5.

The State Board of Education shall adopt textbooks for use in grades one through eight throughout the State, to be furnished without cost as provided by statute.

(History: Sec. 7.5 added June 2, 1970, by Prop. 6. Res.Ch. 358, 1969.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 8.

No public money shall ever be appropriated for the support of any sectarian or denominational school, or any school not under the exclusive control of the officers of the public schools; nor shall any sectarian or denominational doctrine be taught, or instruction thereon be permitted, directly or indirectly, in any of the common schools of this State.

(History: Sec. 8 adopted 1879.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 9.

(a) The University of California shall constitute a public trust, to be administered by the existing corporation known as “The Regents of the University of California,” with full powers of organization and government, subject only to such legislative control as may be necessary to insure the security of its funds and compliance with the terms of the endowments of the university and such competitive bidding procedures as may be made applicable to the university by
statute for the letting of construction contracts, sales of real property, and purchasing of materials, goods, and services. Said corporation shall be in form a board composed of seven ex officio members, which shall be: the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the Assembly, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the president and the vice president of the alumni association of the university and the acting president of the university, and 18 appointive members appointed by the Governor and approved by the Senate, a majority of the membership concurring; provided, however that the present appointive members shall hold office until the expiration of their present terms.

(b) The terms of the members appointed prior to November 5, 1974, shall be 16 years; the terms of two appointive members to expire as heretofore on March 1st of every even-numbered calendar year, and two members shall be appointed for terms commencing on March 1,
1976, and on March 1 of each year thereafter; provided that no such appointments shall be made for terms to commence on March 1, 1979, or on March 1 of each fourth year thereafter, to the end that no appointment to the regents for a newly commencing term shall be made during the first year of any gubernatorial term of office. The terms of the members appointed for terms commencing on and after March 1, 1976, shall be 12 years. During the period of transition until the time when the appointive membership is comprised exclusively of persons serving for terms of 12 years, the total number of appointive members may exceed the numbers specified in the preceeding paragraph.

In case of any vacancy, the term of office of the appointee to fill such vacancy, who shall be appointed by the Governor and approved by the Senate, a majority of the membership concurring, shall be for the balance of the term for which such vacancy exists.

(c) The members of the board may, in their discretion, following procedures established by them and after consultation with representatives of faculty and students of the university, including appropriate officers of the academic senate and student governments, appoint to the board either or both of the following persons as members with all rights of participation: a member of the faculty at a campus of the university or of another institution of higher education; a person enrolled as a student at a campus of the university for each regular academic term during his service as a member of the board. Any person so appointed shall serve for not less than one year commencing on July 1.

(d) Regents shall be able persons broadly reflective of the economic, cultural, and social diversity of the State, including ethnic minorities and women. However, it is not intended that formulas or specific
ratios be applied in the selection of regents.

(e) In the selection of the Regents, the Governor shall consult an advisory committee composed as follows: The Speaker of the Assembly and two public members appointed by the Speaker, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and two public members appointed by the Rules Committee of the Senate, two public members appointed by the Governor, the chairman of the regents of the university, an alumnus of the university chosen by the alumni association of the university, a student of the university chosen by the Council of Student Body Presidents, and a member of the faculty of the university chosen by the academic senate of the university. Public members shall serve for four years, except that one each of the initially appointed members selected by the Speaker of the Assembly, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Governor shall be appointed to serve for two years; student, alumni, and faculty
members shall serve for one year and may not be regents of the university at the time of their service on the advisory committee.

(f) The Regents of the University of California shall be vested with the legal title and the management and disposition of the property of the university and of property held for its benefit and shall have the power to take and hold, either by purchase or by donation, or gift, testamentary or otherwise, or in any other manner, without restriction, all real and personal property for the benefit of the university or incidentally to its conduct; provided, however, that sales of university real property shall be subject to such competitive bidding procedures as may be provided by statute. Said corporation shall also have all the powers necessary or convenient for the effective administration of its trust, including the power to sue and to be sued, to use a seal, and to delegate to its committees or to the faculty of the
university, or to others, such authority or functions as it may deem wise. The Regents shall receive all funds derived from the sale of lands pursuant to the act of Congress of July 2, 1862, and any subsequent acts amendatory thereof. The university shall be entirely independent of all political or sectarian influence and kept free therefrom in the appointment of its regents and in the administration of its affairs, and no person shall be debarred admission to any department of the university on account of race, religion, ethnic heritage, or sex.

(g) Meetings of the Regents of the University of California shall be public, with exceptions and notice requirements as may be provided by statute.

(History: Subdivisions (a) and (f) amended Nov. 2, 1976, by Prop. 4. Res.Ch. 35, 1976.   Other Source:  Entire Sec. 9 was last amended Nov. 5, 1974, by Prop. 4; Res.Ch. 85, 1974.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 14.

The Legislature shall have power, by general law, to provide for the incorporation and organization of school districts, high school districts, and community college districts, of every kind and class, and may classify such districts.

The Legislature may authorize the governing boards of all school districts to initiate and carry on any programs, activities, or to otherwise act in any manner which is not in conflict with the laws and purposes for which school districts are established.

(History: Sec. 14 amended Nov. 7, 1972, by Prop. 5. Res.Ch. 95, 1972.   Operative July 1, 1973.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 16.

(a) It shall be competent, in all charters framed under the authority given by Section 5 of Article XI, to provide, in addition to those provisions allowable by this Constitution, and by the laws of the State for the manner in which, the times at which, and the terms for which the members of boards of education shall be elected or appointed, for their qualifications, compensation and removal, and for the number which shall constitute any one of such boards.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 3 of Article XI, when the
boundaries of a school district or community college district extend beyond the limits of a city whose charter provides for any or all of the foregoing with respect to the members of its board of education, no charter amendment effecting a change in the manner in which, the times at which, or the terms for which the members of the board of education shall be elected or appointed, for their qualifications, compensation, or removal, or for the number which shall constitute such board, shall be adopted unless it is submitted to and approved by a majority of all the qualified electors of the school district or community college district voting on the question. Any such amendment, and any portion of a proposed charter or a revised charter which would establish or change any of the foregoing provisions respecting a board of education, shall be submitted to the electors of the school district or community college district as one or more separate questions. The failure of any such separate question to be approved
shall have the result of continuing in effect the applicable existing law with respect to that board of education.

(History: Sec. 16 amended June 6, 1978, by Prop. 4. Res.Ch. 47, 1977.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

ARTICLE X WATER [SECTION 1. - SEC. 7.]

SECTION 1.

The right of eminent domain is hereby declared to exist in the State to all frontages on the navigable waters of this State.

(History: Sec. 1 added June 8, 1976, by Prop. 14. Res.Ch. 5, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 2.

It is hereby declared that because of the conditions prevailing in this State the general welfare requires that the water resources of the State be put to beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable, and that the waste or unreasonable use or unreasonable method of use of water be prevented, and that the conservation of such waters is to be exercised with a view to the reasonable and beneficial use thereof in the interest of the people and for the public welfare. The right to water or to the use or flow of water in or from any natural stream or water course in this State is and shall be
limited to such water as shall be reasonably required for the beneficial use to be served, and such right does not and shall not extend to the waste or unreasonable use or unreasonable method of use or unreasonable method of diversion of water. Riparian rights in a stream or water course attach to, but to no more than so much of the flow thereof as may be required or used consistently with this section, for the purposes for which such lands are, or may be made adaptable, in view of such reasonable and beneficial uses; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed as depriving any riparian owner of the reasonable use of water of the stream to which the owner’s land is riparian under reasonable methods of diversion and use, or as depriving any appropriator of water to which the appropriator is lawfully entitled. This section shall be self-executing, and the Legislature may also enact laws in the furtherance of the policy in this section contained.

(History: Sec. 2 added June 8, 1976, by Prop. 14. Res.Ch. 5, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 3.

All tidelands within two miles of any incorporated city, city and county, or town in this State, and fronting on the water of any harbor, estuary, bay, or inlet used for the purposes of navigation, shall be withheld from grant or sale to private persons, partnerships, or corporations; provided, however, that any such tidelands, reserved to the State solely for street purposes, which the Legislature finds and declares are not used for navigation purposes and are not necessary for such purposes may be sold to any town, city, county, city and county, municipal corporations, private persons, partnerships or
corporations subject to such conditions as the Legislature determines are necessary to be imposed in connection with any such sales in order to protect the public interest.

(History: Sec. 3 added June 8, 1976, by Prop. 14. Res.Ch. 5, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 4.

No individual, partnership, or corporation, claiming or possessing the frontage or tidal lands of a harbor, bay, inlet, estuary, or other navigable water in this State, shall be permitted to exclude the right of way to such water whenever it is required for any public purpose, nor to destroy or obstruct the free navigation of such water; and the Legislature shall enact such laws as will give the most liberal construction to this provision, so that access to the navigable waters of this State shall be always attainable for the people thereof.

(History: Sec. 4 added June 8, 1976, by Prop. 14. Res.Ch. 5, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 5.

The use of all water now appropriated, or that may hereafter be appropriated, for sale, rental, or distribution, is hereby declared to be a public use, and subject to the regulation and control of the State, in the manner to be prescribed by law.

(History: Sec. 5 added June 8, 1976, by Prop. 14. Res.Ch. 5, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 6.

The right to collect rates or compensation for the use of water supplied to any county, city and county, or town, or the inhabitants thereof, is a franchise, and cannot be exercised except by authority of and in the manner prescribed by law.

(History: Sec. 6 added June 8, 1976, by Prop. 14. Res.Ch. 5, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 7.

Whenever any agency of government, local, state, or federal, hereafter acquires any interest in real property in this State, the acceptance of the interest shall constitute an agreement by the agency to conform to the laws of California as to the acquisition, control, use, and distribution of water with respect to the land so acquired.

(History: Sec. 7 added June 8, 1976, by Prop. 14. Res.Ch. 5, 1976.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

ARTICLE X A WATER RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT [SECTION 1. - SEC. 8.]

SECTION 1.

The people of the State hereby provide the following guarantees and protections in this article for water rights, water quality, and fish and wildlife resources.

(History: Sec. 1 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   No force or effect.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 2.

No statute amending or repealing, or adding to, the provisions of the statute enacted by Senate Bill No. 200 of the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature which specify (1) the manner in which the State will protect fish and wildlife resources in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, Suisun Marsh, and San Francisco Bay system westerly of the delta; (2) the manner in which the State will protect existing water rights in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta; and (3) the manner in which the State will operate the State Water Resources Development System to comply with water quality
standards and water quality control plans, shall become effective unless approved by the electors in the same manner as statutes amending initiative statutes are approved; except that the Legislature may, by statute passed in each house by roll call vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, amend or repeal, or add to, these provisions if the statute does not in any manner reduce the protection of the delta or fish and wildlife.

(History: Sec. 2 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   No force or effect.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 3.

No water shall be available for appropriation by storage in, or by direct diversion from, any of the components of the California Wild and Scenic Rivers System, as such system exists on January 1, 1981, where such appropriation is for export of water into another major hydrologic basin of the State, as defined in the Department of Water Resources Bulletin 160-74, unless such export is expressly authorized prior to such appropriation by: (a) an initiative statute approved by the electors, or (b) the Legislature, by statute passed in each house by roll call vote entered in the
journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring.

(History: Sec. 3 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   No force or effect.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 4.

No statute amending or repealing, or adding to, the provisions of Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 6 of the Water Code (the Delta Protection Act) shall become effective unless approved by the electors in the same manner as statutes amending initiative statutes are approved; except that the Legislature may, by statute passed in each house by roll call vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, amend or repeal, or add to, these provisions if the statute does not in any manner reduce the protection of the delta or fish and
wildlife.

(History: Sec. 4 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   No force or effect.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 5.

No public agency may utilize eminent domain proceedings to acquire water rights, which are held for uses within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta as defined in Section 12220 of the Water Code, or any contract rights for water or water quality maintenance in the Delta for the purpose of exporting such water from the Delta. This provision shall not be construed to prohibit the utilization of eminent domain proceedings for the purpose of acquiring land or any other rights necessary for the construction of water facilities, including, but not limited to, facilities authorized in
Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code.

(History: Sec. 5 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   No force or effect.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 6.

(a) The venue of any of the following actions or proceedings brought in a superior court shall be Sacramento County:

(1) An action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul any provision of the statute enacted by Senate Bill No. 200 of the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(2) An action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the determination made by the Director of Water
Resources and the Director of Fish and Game pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11255 of the Water Code.

(3) An action or proceeding which would have the effect of attacking, reviewing, preventing, or substantially delaying the construction, operation, or maintenance of the peripheral canal unit described in subdivision (a) of Section 11255 of the Water Code.

(4) An action or proceeding to require the State Water Resources Development System to comply with subdivision (b) of Section 11460 of the Water Code.

(5) An action or proceeding to require the Department of Water Resources or its successor agency to comply with the permanent agreement specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11256 of the Water Code.

(6) An action or proceeding to require the
Department of Water Resources or its successor agency to comply with the provisions of the contracts entered into pursuant to Section 11456 of the Water Code.

(b) An action or proceeding described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be commenced within one year after the effective date of the statute enacted by Senate Bill No. 200 of the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature. Any other action or proceeding described in subdivision (a) shall be commenced within one year after the cause of action arises unless a shorter period is otherwise provided by statute.

(c) The superior court or a court of appeals shall give preference to the actions or proceedings described in this section over all civil actions or proceedings pending in the court. The superior court shall commence hearing any such action or proceeding within six months after the commencement of the action or
proceeding, provided that any such hearing may be delayed by joint stipulation of the parties or at the discretion of the court for good cause shown. The provisions of this section shall supersede any provisions of law requiring courts to give preference to other civil actions or proceedings. The provisions of this subdivision may be enforced by mandamus.

(d) The Supreme Court shall, upon the request of any party, transfer to itself, before a decision in the court of appeal, any appeal or petition for extraordinary relief from an action or proceeding described in this section, unless the Supreme Court determines that the action or proceeding is unlikely to substantially affect (1) the construction, operation, or maintenance of the peripheral canal unit described in subdivision (a) of Section 11255 of the Water Code, (2) compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 11460 of the Water Code, (3) compliance with the permanent agreement specified in
Section 11256 of the Water Code, or (4) compliance with the provisions of the contracts entered into pursuant to Section 11456 of the Water Code. The request for transfer shall receive preference on the Supreme Court’s calendar. If the action or proceeding is transferred to the Supreme Court, the Supreme Court shall commence to hear the matter within six months of the transfer unless the parties by joint stipulation request additional time or the court, for good cause shown, grants additional time.

(e) The remedy prescribed by the court for an action or proceeding described in paragraph (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a) shall include, but need not be limited to, compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 11460 of the Water Code, the permanent agreement specified in Section 11256 of the Water Code, or the provisions of the contracts entered into pursuant to Section 11456 of the Water Code.

(f) The Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento may apply to the State Board of Control for actual costs imposed by the requirements of this section upon the county, and the State Board of Control shall pay such actual costs.

(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, nothing in this Article shall be construed as prohibiting the Supreme Court from exercising the transfer authority contained in Article VI, Section 12 of the Constitution.

(History: Sec. 6 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   No force or effect.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 7.

State agencies shall exercise their authorized powers in a manner consistent with the protections provided by this article.

(History: Sec. 7 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   No force or effect.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 8.

This article shall have no force or effect unless Senate Bill No. 200 of the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted and takes effect.

(History: Sec. 8 added Nov. 4, 1980, by Prop. 8. Res.Ch. 49, 1980.   Note: SB 200 (Stats. 1980, Ch. 632) did not take effect and was rejected by referendum on June 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

ARTICLE X B MARINE RESOURCES PROTECTION ACT OF 1990 [SECTION 1. - SEC. 16.]

SECTION 1.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Marine Resources Protection Act of 1990.

(History: Sec. 1 added Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 132. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 2.

(a) “District” means a fish and game district as defined in the Fish and Game Code by statute on January 1, 1990.

(b) Except as specifically provided in this article, all references to Fish and Game Code sections, articles, chapters, parts, and divisions are defined as those statutes in effect on January 1, 1990.

(c) “Ocean waters” means the waters of the Pacific Ocean regulated by the State.

(d) “Zone”
means the Marine Resources Protection zone established pursuant to this article. The zone consists of the following:

(1) In waters less than 70 fathoms or within one mile, whichever is less, around the Channel Islands consisting of the Islands of San Miguel, Santa Rosa, Santa Cruz, Anacapa, San Nicolaus, Santa Barbara, Santa Catalina, and San Clemente. 

(2) The area within three nautical miles offshore of the mainland coast, and the area within three nautical miles off any manmade breakwater, between a line extending due west from Point Arguello and a line extending due west from the Mexican border.

(3) In waters less than 35 fathoms between a line running 180 degrees true from Point Fermin and a line running 270 degrees true from the south jetty of Newport Harbor.

(History: Sec. 2 added Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 132. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 3.

(a) From January 1, 1991, to December 31, 1993, inclusive, gill nets or trammel nets may only be used in the zone pursuant to a nontransferable permit issued by the Department of Fish and Game pursuant to Section 5.

(b) On and after January 1, 1994, gill nets and trammel nets shall not be used in the zone.

(History: Sec. 3 added Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 132. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, gill nets and trammel nets may not be used to take any species of rockfish.

(b) In ocean waters north of Point Arguello on and after the effective date of this article, the use of gill nets and trammel nets shall be regulated by the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 8660), Article 5 (commencing with Section 8680) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 8720) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code, or any regulation or order issued pursuant to
these articles, in effect on January 1, 1990, except that as to Sections 8680, 8681, 8681.7, and 8682, and subdivisions (a) through (f), inclusive of Section 8681.5 of the Fish and Game Code, or any regulation or order issued pursuant to these sections, the provisions in effect on January 1, 1989, shall control where not in conflict with other provisions of this article, and shall be applicable to all ocean waters. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Legislature shall not be precluded from imposing more restrictions on the use and/or possession of gill nets or trammel nets. The Director of the Department of Fish and Game shall not authorize the use of gill nets or trammel nets in any area where the use is not permitted even if the director makes specified findings.

(History: Sec. 4 added Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 132. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 5.

The Department of Fish and Game shall issue a permit to use a gill net or trammel net in the zone for the period specified in subdivision (a) of Section 3 to any applicant who meets both of the following requirements:

(a) Has a commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Sections 7850–7852.3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) Has a permit issued pursuant to Section 8681 of the Fish and Game Code and is presently the owner or operator of a vessel equipped with a gill net or trammel
net.

(History: Sec. 5 added Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 132. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 6.

The Department of Fish and Game shall charge the following fees for permits issued pursuant to Section 5 pursuant to the following schedule: Calendar YearFee1991$250199250019931,000

(History: Sec. 6 added Nov. 6, 1990, by Prop. 132. Initiative measure.)
-------------------------------------------

SEC. 7.

(a) Within 90 days after the effective date of this section, every person who intends to seek the compensation provided in subdivision (b) shall notify the Department of Fish and Game, on forms provided by the department, of that intent. Any person who does not submit the form within that 90-day period shall not be compensated pursuant to subdivision (b). The department shall publish a list of all persons submitting the form within 120 days after the effective date of this section.

(b) After July 1, 1993, and before January 1,